Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
Subpart 4 Fees

8-2-190.
Taxation as real property.

A manufactured home which constitutes real property shall not be subject to Article 10 of Chapter 5 of Title 48 but shall instead be taxed as real property and a part of the underlying real estate.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-190

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 3-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2006, p. 702, § 1/SB 253.

8-2-191.
Filing fee.

The commissioner shall charge a fee of $18.00 for any filing under this part.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-191

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 3-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2006, p. 702, § 1/SB 253.